Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.164

Disabled American veteran license plates.

"Disabled American veteran license plates" means special license plates issued to a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, who meets the requirements provided in RCW 46.18.235.

[ 2010 c 161 s 113.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.